Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7806
Primary Care Investment Council; convene; review and update.

The Primary Care Investment Council shall convene at least once a year through 2028 to review the state's progress in meeting the target level of primary care investment, update the data regarding public health benefits and cost savings as a result of investments in primary care, update the strategies to achieve the target level of primary care investment, and consider other information as necessary.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 16.